Utah statutes.
64-13-39.   Standards for health care facilities.

All health care facilities, as defined in Section 26-21-2, owned or operated by the department shall apply for and meet the requirements for accreditation by the National Commission for Correctional Health Care.  The department shall begin the application process in a timely manner to facilitate accreditation of the health care facilities of the department on or before January 1, 1996.  Inspections to ensure compliance and accreditation shall be conducted by staff of the national commission.

